Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-27] Extension of benefits to
dependents. Dependents of a person in military service shall be entitled
to the benefits accorded to persons in military service under this part upon
application to a court therefor, unless in the opinion of the court the ability
of these dependents to comply with the terms of the obligation, contract,
lease, or bailment has not been materially impaired by reason of the military
service of the person upon whom the applicants are dependent. [L 1994, c
257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next